pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do keyboardów > Torby i futerały na keyboardy: Torby na keyboardy; Futerały na keyboardy; Futerały na kółkach na keyboardy; Miękkie futerały na keyboardy
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Keyboardzubehör > Keyboardtaschen: Keyboard-Transporttaschen; Keyboard-Hartschalenkoffer; Keyboard-Rollkoffer; Keyboard-Tragetasche
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para teclado > Estojos e bolsas para teclado: Gig bags para teclado musical; Estojos rígidos para teclado musical; Estojos para teclado musical; Estojos macios para teclado musical
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์คีย์บอร์ด > กระเป๋าและที่ใส่คีย์บอร์ด: กระเป๋ากิ๊กแบ็กใส่คีย์บอร์ด; ที่ใส่คีย์บอร์ดแบบแข็ง; ที่ใส่คีย์บอร์ดติดล้อ; ที่ใส่คีย์บอร์ดแบบนุ่ม
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Muzikinių klaviatūrų priedai > Muzikinių klaviatūrų krepšiai ir dėklai: Muzikinių klaviatūrų dėklai; Kieti muzikinių klaviatūrų dėklai; Muzikinių klaviatūrų dėklai su ratukais; Minkšti muzikinių klaviatūrų dėklai
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru claviatură muzicală > Genți și huse pentru claviatură muzicală: Huse pentru claviaturi; Cutii rigide pentru claviatură muzicală; Cutii cu rotile pentru claviatură muzicală; Huse pentru claviatură muzicală
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Klávesové nástroje – příslušenství > Obaly a kufry na klávesnice: Gigbagy na klávesové nástroje; Pevná pouzdra na klávesové nástroje; Pouzdra na klávesové nástroje na kolečkách; Měkká pouzdra na klávesové nástroje
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per tastiera > Custodie e borse per tastiere: Borse per tastiere; Custodie rigide per tastiere; Custodie per trasportare tastiere; Custodie morbide per tastiere
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til elektroniske orgler > Vesker og kasser til elektroniske orgler: Keyboard-gigbags; Harde keyboardvesker; Rullevesker for keyboard; Myke keyboardvesker
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za glasbene klaviature > Torbe in kovčki za glasbene klaviature: Torbe za glasbene klaviature; Trdi kovčki za glasbene klaviature; Kovčki za glasbene klaviature na kolesih; Mehki kovčki za glasbene klaviature
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за клавишни инструменти > Чанти и калъфи за клавишни инструменти: Чанти за клавишни инструменти; Твърди калъфи за клавишни инструменти; Калъфи с колела за клавишни инструменти; Меки калъфи за клавишни инструменти
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Zenei billentyűzet kiegészítők > Zeneibillentyűzet-táskák és -tokok: Zeneibillentyűzet-táskák; Zeneibillentyűzet-keménytokok; Zeneibillentyűzet-tekercstokok; Zeneibillentyűzet-puhatokok
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Musikkeyboard – tilbehør > Tasker og kasser til keyboards: Tasker til keyboards; Hårde kasser til keyboards; Rullekasser til keyboards; Bløde kasser til keyboards
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Dodaci za klavijature > Torbe i koferi za klavijature: Koncertne torbe za klavijature; Koferi za klavijature; Koferi na kola za klavijature; Mekane torbe za klavijature
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à clavier > Étuis et housses pour claviers: Housses pour clavier; Étuis rigides pour clavier; Valises à roulettes pour clavier; Étuis souples pour clavier
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor keyboards > Keyboardhoezen en -tassen: Keyboardgigbags; Harde keyboardtassen; Keyboardroltassen; Zachte keyboardtassen
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till keyboards > Klaviaturväskor och -lådor: Musikinstrument keyboard spelningsfodral; Musikinstrument keyboard hårda fodral; Musikinstrument keyboard fodral med hjul; Musikinstrument keyboard mjuka fodral
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 電子キーボード用品 > キーボードケース: ミュージカルキーボード ギグバッグ; ミュージカルキーボード ハードケース; ミュージカルキーボードキャスター付きケース; ミュージカルキーボード ソフトケース
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de teclado musical > Sacos e estojos de teclado musical: Gigbags de teclado musical; Estojos rígidos de teclado musical; Estojos de enrolar para teclado musical; Estojos macios de teclado musical
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 乐器键盘配件 > 乐器键盘包/盒: 乐器键盘包; 乐器键盘硬盒; 乐器键盘拉杆箱; 乐器键盘软盒
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Kosketinsoittimen lisätarvikkeet > Kosketinsoittimen laukut ja kotelot: Kosketinsoittimen kantolaukut; Kosketinsoittimen kovat kotelot; Kosketinsoittimen pyörälliset kotelot; Kosketinsoittimen pehmeät kotelot
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Musical Keyboard Accessories > Musical Keyboard Bags & Cases: Musical Keyboard Gigbags; Musical Keyboard Hard Cases; Musical Keyboard Rolling Cases; Musical Keyboard Soft Cases
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 건반악기 부대용품 > 건반악기 가방/케이스: 건반악기 패딩 가방; 건반악기 하드 케이스; 건반악기 바퀴 케이스; 건반악기 소프트 케이스
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre klávesy > Tašky a puzdrá na klávesy: Tašky na klávesy; Pevné puzdrá na klávesy; Kufríky na klávesy; Ľahké obaly na klávesy
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện nhạc cụ có phím > Túi và giỏ đựng đàn phím: Túi đựng đàn phím; Hộp cứng đựng đàn phím; Hộp đựng đàn phím có bánh xe; Hộp mềm đựng đàn phím
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для клавишных инструментов > Сумки и футляры для клавишных инструментов: Сумки для клавишных инструментов; Жесткие футляры для клавишных инструментов; Футляры для клавишных инструментов с колесиками; Мягкие футляры для клавишных инструментов
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Klavye Aksesuarları > Müzik Klavye Çantaları ve Kutuları: Müzik Klavye Çantaları; Müzik Klavye Sert Kılıfları; Müzik Klavye Rulo Kılıflar; Müzik Klavye Yumuşak Kılıflar
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para teclados > Bolsas y fundas para teclados: Fundas para teclados musicales; Estuches rígidos para teclados musicales; Estuches con ruedas para teclados musicales; Fundas blandas para teclados musicales
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 鍵盤琴配件 > 樂器鍵盤收納袋/收納箱: 鍵盤樂器袋; 硬殼鍵盤樂器箱; 滾輪鍵盤樂器箱; 軟殼鍵盤樂器箱
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ για συνθεσάιζερ > Τσάντες & θήκες για συνθεσάιζερ: Μαλακές θήκες ευκολίας και φορητότητας για συνθεσάιζερ; Σκληρές θήκες για συνθεσάιζερ; Τροχήλατες θήκες για συνθεσάιζερ; Μαλακές θήκες για συνθεσάιζερ